Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2685.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; attorney general; K-12 mental health; telehealth provider grants; grant prioritization; exemption A. The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated from the consumer remediation subaccount of the consumer restitution and remediation revolving fund established by section 44-1531.02, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the attorney general for grants for K-12 mental health providers who offer telehealth services. This amount consists of monies deposited in the subaccount pursuant to opioid claims-related litigation or settlement. The monies appropriated in this subsection shall be distributed as three-year grants for up to three telehealth providers that: 1. Provide a comprehensive mental health platform that includes clinical assessments, short-term therapy using telehealth services and crisis intervention specifically tailored for the K-12 environment. 2. Demonstrate the ability to coordinate care with existing school nurses, counselors and administrative staff to ensure a whole child approach. 3. Offer services at no cost to families, regardless of insurance status or ability to pay. 4. Have the capacity to serve students on campus during school hours. 5. Provide evidence-based treatment for common pediatric conditions, including anxiety, depression and grief. 6. Have not received an award or contract from this state for similar K-12 telehealth services before the effective date of this section. B. The attorney general shall prioritize the grants distributed pursuant to subsection A of this section to applicants who demonstrate an enterprise-wide implementation model that is capable of serving diverse school districts, ranging from large urban centers to rural and tribal communities. C. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations, until June 30, 2029.